Tennessee, session 114, HB0110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 45, Chapter 2, Part 8, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Without limiting this part, the commissioner may determine the type,
amounts, and other characteristics of deposit insurance required to be maintained by
each state bank. In making the determination, the commissioner shall consider the
following factors:
(1) The safety and soundness of the state bank;
(2) The ability of the state bank to promote the economic progress of this
state;
(3) Public confidence in the banking system;
(4) The views of the banking industry in this state; and
(5) Any other factors the commissioner may deem relevant.
(b) The commissioner may promulgate rules to implement this section. The
rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures
Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0110
000559
- 1 -